en: Toy Race Car & Track Sets
xx: Toy Race Car & Track Sets
cs: Sady závodních autíček
da: Legetøjsracerbiler og racerbaner
de: Rennbahnen
es: Colecciones de coches de carreras de juguete
fr: Coffrets et circuits de voitures de course miniatures
it: Set auto da corsa giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのレーシングカーセット
nl: Speelgoedracebanen en -auto's
no: Sett med lekeracerbiler og baner
pl: Wyścigówki i tory
pt: Conjuntos de carro de corrida de brinquedo
ru: Комплекты игрушечных гоночных автомобилей и трасс
sv: Paket med leksaksracerbilar och bilbanor
tr: Oyuncak Yarış Arabası ve Yol Setleri

en: Toy Spaceships
xx: Toy Spaceships
cs: Kosmické lodě na hraní
da: Legetøjsrumskibe
de: Spielzeugraumschiffe
es: Naves espaciales de juguete
fr: Vaisseaux spatiaux jouets
it: Navi spaziali giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの宇宙船
nl: Speelgoedruimteschepen
no: Lekeromskip
pl: Statki kosmiczne
pt: Naves espaciais de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные космические корабли
sv: Leksaksrymdskepp
tr: Oyuncak Uzay Gemileri

en: Toy Trains & Train Sets
xx: Toy Trains & Train Sets
cs: Vláčky a vlakové sady
da: Legetøjstog og togbaner
de: Züge & Eisenbahnsets
es: Trenes de juguete y juegos de trenes
fr: Trains jouets et sets de trains, Train électrique (jouet)
it: Treni e set di treni giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの電車
nl: Speelgoedtreinen en treinsets
no: Leketog og togsett
pl: Kolejki i zestawy
pt: Trens de brinquedo e conjuntos de trem
ru: Игрушечные железные дороги
sv: Leksakståg och leksaksjärnvägar
tr: Oyuncak Trenler ve Tren Setleri

en: Toy Trucks & Construction Vehicles
xx: Toy Trucks & Construction Vehicles
cs: Nákladní a stavební auta na hraní
da: Legetøjslastbiler og -byggemaskiner
de: Spielzeug-LKWs & -Baumaschinen
es: Vehículos de construcción y camiones de juguete
fr: Camions et engins de chantier jouets
it: Camion e veicoli da costruzione giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのトラック・建築車両
nl: Speelgoedvrachtauto's en -bouwvoertuigen
no: Lekelastebiler og -anleggsmaskiner
pl: Ciężarówki i maszyny budowlane
pt: Caminhões e veículos de construção de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные грузовые и строительные машины
sv: Leksakslastbilar och konstruktionsfordon
tr: Oyuncak Kamyonlar ve İnşaat Araçları

en: Pretend Play
xx: Pretend Play
cs: Napodobovací hry
da: Rollespil
de: Kinder-Rollenspiele
es: Juguetes de simulación
fr: Jouets d'imitation
it: Giochi di simulazione
ja: おままごと・ごっこ遊び
nl: Spelen
no: Rolleleker
pl: Zabawa przez imitację
pt: Faz de conta
ru: Сюжетно-ролевые игры
sv: Låtsaslekar
tr: Yap-İnan Oyunu

en: Play Money & Banking
xx: Play Money & Banking
cs: Dětské peníze a bankovky
da: Legepenge og -bank
de: Spielgeld & Banken
es: Juegos de banca y dinero
fr: Jeux de banque et d'argent
it: Denaro e banche giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのレジスター・ATM
nl: Speelgeld en speelgoedbank
no: Lekepenger og -banker
pl: Banki i pieniądze do zabawy
pt: Dinheiro e banco de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные деньги
sv: Leksakspengar och banker
tr: Oyuncak Para ve Banka

en: Pretend Electronics
xx: Pretend Electronics
cs: Napodobeniny elektroniky
da: Elektrisk legetøj
de: Elektronisches Rollenspielzeug
es: Juguetes de electricista
fr: Appareils électroniques factices
it: Dispositivi elettronici giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの電気製品
nl: Speelgoedelektronica
no: Lekeelektronikk
pl: Imitacje urządzeń elektronicznych
pt: Eletrônicos de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечная электроника
sv: Låtsaselektronik
tr: Oyuncak Elektronik Aletler

en: Pretend Housekeeping
xx: Pretend Housekeeping
cs: Napodobeniny domácích potřeb
da: Husholdningslegetøj
de: Haushaltsspielzeug
es: Juguetes de ama de casa
fr: Jeux de ménage
it: Elettrodomestici giocattolo
ja: おままごと
nl: Speelgoed - huishoudelijke apparaten
no: Lekehusarbeid
pl: Zabawki do sprzątania
pt: Brincar de casinha
ru: Игрушечное домашнее хозяйство
sv: Leksakshushållsutrustning
tr: Temizlik ve Ev Bakımı Oyunu

en: Pretend Lawn & Garden
xx: Pretend Lawn & Garden
cs: Napodobeniny zahradnických potřeb
da: Legetøjshaveredskaber
de: Gartengeräte für Kinder
es: Juguetes de jardinería
fr: Jeux de jardinage
it: Prati e giardini giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのガーデニング用品
nl: Speelgoed - tuinieren
no: Plen- og hageleker
pl: Zabawki do trawnika i ogrodu
pt: Brincar de jardinagem
ru: Игрушечные садовые инструменты
sv: Leksaksträdgårdar
tr: Oyuncak Çim ve Bahçe

en: Pretend Professions & Role Playing
xx: Pretend Professions & Role Playing
cs: Napodobeniny pracovních pomůcek
da: Udklædningstøj og rollespil
de: Berufespielzeug & Rollenspiele
es: Juguetes de profesiones y roles
fr: Jeux de rôles et de métiers
it: Professioni e ruoli per giocare
ja: お仕事ごっこ
nl: Speelgoed - beroepen en rollenspellen
no: Lekeyrker og rollespill
pl: Zabawki do odgrywania ról i zawodów
pt: Brincar de profissões e representar
ru: Игрушки для профессий
sv: Leksaksyrken och rollspel
tr: Oyundan İşler ve Rol Oyunu

en: Pretend Makeup Sets
fr: Ensembles cosmétiques pour enfants (jouet), Ensemble cosmétique pour enfant (jouet)

en: Pretend Shopping & Grocery
xx: Pretend Shopping & Grocery
cs: Hry na obchod
da: Legetøj – butik og grøntsager
de: Einkaufsladen
es: Juego simbólico de comprar y vender
fr: Jeux de la marchande et de l'épicier
it: Supermarket giocattolo
ja: お買い物ごっこ
nl: Speelgoed - boodschappen en toebehoren
no: Lekebutikk og -salgsvarer
pl: Zabawa w zakupy spożywcze
pt: Supermercado de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные наборы для похода в магазин
sv: Låtsasaffärer och låtsasmat
tr: Alışveriş ve Market Oyuncakları

en: Toy Kitchens & Play Food
xx: Toy Kitchens & Play Food
cs: Dětské kuchyňky a jídlo na hraní
da: Legekøkken og -mad
de: Spielzeugküchen & Spielzeuglebensmittel
es: Juguetes de cocina y comida
fr: Dînettes et aliments jouets
it: Cucine e cibi giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのキッチンセット・食べ物
nl: Speelgoedkeuken en -voedsel
no: Lekekjøkken og lekemat
pl: Kuchnie i jedzenie do zabawy
pt: Cozinhas e comidas de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные кухни и еда
sv: Leksakskök och låtsasmat
tr: Oyuncak Mutfaklar ve Yiyecekler

en: Play Food
xx: Play Food
cs: Jídlo na hraní
da: Legetøjsmad
de: Spielzeuglebensmittel
es: Comida de juguete
fr: Jouets imitant des aliments
it: Cibo giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの食べ物
nl: Speelgoedeten
no: Lekemat
pl: Zabawki w kształcie produktów spożywczych
pt: Comidas de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечная еда
sv: Leksaksmat
tr: Oyuncak Yiyecekler

en: Toy Cookware
xx: Toy Cookware
cs: Kuchyňské potřeby na hraní
da: Legetøjskøkkengrej
de: Spielzeugkochgeschirr
es: Utensilios de cocina de juguete
fr: Batteries de cuisine pour enfants
it: Pentole giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの調理器具
nl: Speelgoedkeukengerei
no: Lekekasseroller
pl: Zabawkowe naczynia kuchenne
pt: Panelas de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечная посуда
sv: Leksakskokkärl
tr: Oyuncak Mutfak Takımları

en: Toy Kitchens
xx: Toy Kitchens
cs: Kuchyně na hraní
da: Legetøjskøkkener
de: Spielzeugküchen
es: Cocinas de juguete
fr: Cuisines pour enfants
it: Cucine giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのキッチンセット
nl: Speelgoedkeukens
no: Lekekjøkken
pl: Kuchenki zabawkowe
pt: Cozinhas infantis
ru: Игрушечные кухонные гарнитуры
sv: Leksakskök
tr: Oyuncak Mutfaklar

en: Toy Tableware
xx: Toy Tableware
cs: Nádobí na hraní
da: Legetøjsservice
de: Spielzeuggeschirr
es: Utensilios de mesa de juguete
fr: Dinettes
it: Stoviglie giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの食器
nl: Speelgoedservies
no: Dukkeserviser
pl: Zabawkowe zastawy stołowe
pt: Utensílios de cozinha infantis
ru: Игрушечная посуда для сервировки стола
sv: Leksaksservis
tr: Oyuncak Yemek Setleri

en: Toy Tools
xx: Toy Tools
cs: Nářadí na hraní
da: Legetøjsværktøj
de: Spielwerkzeug
es: Herramientas de juguete
fr: Outils de jeu
it: Attrezzi giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの工具
nl: Speelgoedgereedschap
no: Lekeverktøy
pl: Narzędzia do zabawy
pt: Ferramentas de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные инструменты
sv: Leksaksverktyg
tr: Oyuncak Araçlar

en: Electronic Toys
fr: Jouets électroniques, Jouet électronique

en: Remote Control Toy Accessories
xx: Remote Control Toy Accessories
cs: Autíčka na rádiové ovládání – příslušenství
da: Fjernstyret legetøj – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für ferngesteuerte Fahrzeuge
es: Accesorios para vehículos de control remoto
fr: Accessoires pour véhicules radiocommandés
it: Accessori veicoli radiocomandati
ja: ラジコン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor radiografisch bestuurbare voertuigen
no: Tilbehør til fjernstyrte leker
pl: Akcesoria do zabawek zdalnie sterowanych
pt: Acessórios para brinquedos de controle remoto
ru: Принадлежности для радиоуправляемых игрушек
sv: Tillbehör till radiostyrda leksaker
tr: Uzaktan Kumandalı Oyuncak Aksesuarları